California statutes. Vehicle Code
A “camper” is a structure designed to be mounted upon a motor vehicle and to provide facilities for human habitation or camping purposes. A camper having one axle shall not be considered a vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 228.)
-------------------------------------------

245.

A “carry-all” is that type of earth-moving equipment which is not self-propelled but which is designed for use behind tractors or other motive power and which is self-loading by means of a cutting blade which is lowered at an angle to dig into the ground. The term includes, but is not limited to, such types of vehicles as carry the trade names of LaPlant-Choate, LeTourneau, and Be Ge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

246.

A “certificate of compliance” for the purposes of this code is an electronic or printed document issued by a state agency, board, or commission, or authorized person, setting forth that the requirements of a particular law, rule or regulation, within its jurisdiction to regulate or administer has been satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

247.

“Certificate of title” or “certificate of ownership” means an official record in paper or electronic form, compliant with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4450, that establishes and provides proof of legal ownership of a vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 9.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

250.

A “chop shop” is any building, lot, or other premises where any person has been engaged in altering, destroying, disassembling, dismantling, reassembling, or storing any motor vehicle or motor vehicle part known to be illegally obtained by theft, fraud, or conspiracy to defraud, in order to do either of the following:

(a) Alter, counterfeit, deface, destroy, disguise, falsify, forge, obliterate, or remove the identity, including the vehicle identification number, of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part, in order to misrepresent the identity of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part, or to prevent the identification of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part.

(b) Sell or dispose of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

“City” includes every city and city and county within this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

A “clean fuel vehicle” means any passenger or commercial vehicle or pickup truck that is fueled by alternative fuels, as defined in Section 301 of the Energy Policy Act of 1992 (P.L. 102-486), and produces emissions which do not exceed whichever of the following standards, as defined by regulations of the State Air Resources Board in effect on January 1, 1994, is applicable to the model year of the vehicle:

(a) For a vehicle of the 1994 to 1996, inclusive, model year, the emission standard applicable to a transitional low-emission vehicle.

(b) For a vehicle of the 1997 model year, the emission standard applicable to a low-emission vehicle.

(c) For a vehicle of the 1998 to 2000, inclusive, model year, the emission standard applicable to an ultra low-emission vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1159, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

259.

“Collector motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle owned by a collector, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5051, and the motor vehicle is used primarily in shows, parades, charitable functions, and historical exhibitions for display, maintenance, and preservation, and is not used primarily for transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

(a) A “commercial vehicle” is a motor vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code used or maintained for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or profit or designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.

(b) Passenger vehicles and house cars that are not used for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or profit are not commercial vehicles. This subdivision shall not apply to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3.

(c) Any vanpool vehicle is not a commercial vehicle.

(d) The definition of a commercial vehicle in this section does not apply to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

265.

The “commissioner” is the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

266.

A “consignment” is an arrangement under which a dealer agrees to accept possession of a vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code from an owner for the purpose of selling the vehicle and to pay the owner or the owner’s designee from the proceeds of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 815, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

267.

A “converter” is a person, other than a vehicle manufacturer, who, prior to the retail sale of a new vehicle, does any of the following to the vehicle:

(a) Assembles, installs, or affixes a body, cab, or special equipment to the vehicle chassis.

(b) Substantially adds to, subtracts from, or modifies the vehicle, if it is a previously assembled or manufactured new vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

270.

“County” includes every county and city and county within this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

273.

A “crib sheet” or “cribbing device” is any paper or device designed for cheating by supplying examination answers without questions to an applicant for the purpose of fraudulently qualifying the applicant for any class of driver’s license, permit, or certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 960, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

275.

“Crosswalk” is either:

(a) That portion of a roadway included within the prolongation or connection of the boundary lines of sidewalks at intersections where the intersecting roadways meet at approximately right angles, except the prolongation of such lines from an alley across a street.

(b) Any portion of a roadway distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, there shall not be a crosswalk where local authorities have placed signs indicating no crossing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

280.

“Darkness” is any time from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise and any other time when visibility is not sufficient to render clearly discernible any person or vehicle on the highway at a distance of 1,000 feet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 635.)
-------------------------------------------

285.

“Dealer” is a person not otherwise expressly excluded by Section 286 who:

(a) For commission, money, or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, buys, or offers for sale, negotiates or attempts to negotiate, a sale or exchange of an interest in, a vehicle subject to registration, a motorcycle, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle subject to identification under this code, or a trailer subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1, or induces or attempts to induce any person to buy or exchange an interest in a vehicle and, who receives or expects to receive a commission, money, brokerage fees, profit, or any other thing of value, from either the seller or purchaser of the vehicle.

(b) Is engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling vehicles or buying or taking in trade, vehicles for the purpose of resale, selling, or offering for sale, or consigned to be sold, or otherwise dealing in vehicles, whether or not the vehicles are owned by the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 270, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

286.

The term “dealer” does not include any of the following:

(a) Insurance companies, banks, finance companies, public officials, or any other person coming into possession of vehicles in the regular course of business, who sells vehicles under a contractual right or obligation, in performance of an official duty, or in authority of any court of law, if the sale is for the purpose of saving the seller from loss or pursuant to the authority of a court.

(b) Persons who sell or distribute vehicles of a type subject to registration or trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1 for a manufacturer to vehicle dealers licensed under this code, or who are employed by manufacturers or distributors to promote the sale of vehicles dealt in by those manufacturers or distributors. However, any of those persons who also sell vehicles at retail are vehicle dealers and are subject to this code.

(c) Persons regularly employed as salespersons by vehicle dealers licensed under this code while acting within the scope of that employment.

(d) Persons engaged exclusively in the bona fide business of exporting vehicles or of soliciting orders for the sale and delivery of vehicles outside the territorial limits of the United States, if no federal excise tax is legally payable or refundable on any of the transactions. Persons not engaged exclusively in the bona fide business of exporting vehicles, but who are engaged in the business of soliciting orders for the sale and delivery of vehicles, outside the territorial limits of the United States are exempt from licensure as dealers only if their sales of vehicles produce less than 10 percent of their total gross revenue from all business transacted.

(e) Persons not engaged in the purchase or sale of vehicles as a business, who dispose of any vehicle acquired and used in good faith, for their own personal use, or for use in their business, and not for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this code.

(f) Persons who are engaged in the purchase, sale, or exchange of vehicles, other than motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, or trailers subject to identification under this code, that are not intended for use on the highways.

(g) Persons temporarily retained as auctioneers solely for the purpose of disposing of vehicle stock inventories by means of public auction on behalf of the owners at the owners’ place of business, or as otherwise approved by the department, if intermediate physical possession or control of, or an ownership interest in, the inventory is not conveyed to the persons so retained.

(h) Persons who are engaged exclusively in the business of purchasing, selling, servicing, or exchanging racing vehicles, parts for racing vehicles, and trailers designed and intended by the manufacturer to be used exclusively for carrying racing vehicles. For purposes of this subdivision, “racing vehicle” means a motor vehicle of a type used exclusively in a contest of speed or in a competitive trial of speed which is not intended for use on the highways.

(i) A person who is a lessor.

(j) A person who is a renter.

(k) A salvage pool.

(l) A yacht broker who is subject to the Yacht and Ship Brokers Act (Article 2 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of the Harbors and Navigation Code) and who sells used boat trailers in conjunction with the sale of a vessel.

(m) A licensed automobile dismantler who sells vehicles that have been reported for dismantling as provided in Section 11520.

(n) The Director of Corrections when selling vehicles pursuant to Section 2813.5 of the Penal Code.

(o) (1) Any public or private nonprofit charitable, religious, or educational institution or organization that sells vehicles if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The institution or organization qualifies for state tax-exempt status under Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(B) The vehicles sold were donated to the nonprofit charitable, religious, or educational institution or organization.

(C) The vehicles subject to retail sale meet all of the applicable equipment requirements of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) and are in compliance with emission control requirements as evidenced by the issuance of a certificate pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code. Under no circumstances may any institution or organization transfer the responsibility of obtaining a smog inspection certificate to the buyer of the vehicle.

(D) The proceeds of the sale of the vehicles are retained by that institution or organization for its charitable, religious, or educational purposes.

(2) An institution or organization described in paragraph (1) may sell vehicles on behalf of another institution or organization under the following conditions:

(A) The nonselling institution or organization meets the requirements of paragraph (1).

(B) The selling and nonselling institutions or organizations enter into a signed, written agreement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1660.

(C) The selling institution or organization transfers the proceeds from the sale of each vehicle to the nonselling institution or organization within 45 days of the sale. All net proceeds transferred to the nonselling institution or organization shall clearly be identifiable to the sale of a specific vehicle. The selling institution or organization may retain a percentage of the proceeds from the sale of a particular vehicle. However, any retained proceeds shall be used by the selling institution or organization for its charitable, religious, or educational purposes.

(D) At the time of transferring the proceeds, the selling institution or organization shall provide to the nonselling institution or organization, an itemized listing of the vehicles sold and the amount for which each vehicle was sold.

(E) In the event the selling institution or organization cannot complete a retail sale of a particular vehicle, or if the vehicle cannot be transferred as a wholesale transaction to a dealer licensed under this code, the vehicle shall be returned to the nonselling institution or organization and the written agreement revised to reflect that return. Under no circumstances may a selling institution or organization transfer or donate the vehicle to a third party that is excluded from the definition of a dealer under this section.

(3) An institution or organization described in this subdivision shall retain all records required to be retained pursuant to Section 1660.

(p) A motor club, as defined in Section 12142 of the Insurance Code, that does not arrange or negotiate individual motor vehicle purchase transactions on behalf of its members but refers members to a new motor vehicle dealer for the purchase of a new motor vehicle and does not receive a fee from the dealer contingent upon the sale of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 836, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

288.

“Declared combined gross weight” equals the total unladen weight of the combination of vehicles plus the heaviest load that will be transported by that combination of vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 12.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

289.

“Declared gross vehicle weight” means weight that equals the total unladen weight of the vehicle plus the heaviest load that will be transported on the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 13.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

290.

“Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles except, when used in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 2 and in Divisions 11 (commencing with Section 21000), 12 (commencing with Section 24000), 13 (commencing with Section 29000), 14 (commencing with Section 31600), 14.1 (commencing with Section 32000), 14.3 (commencing with Section 32100), 14.5 (commencing with Section 33000), 14.7 (commencing with Section 34000), and 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500), it shall mean the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

291.

Any reference in this code to the Department of Public Works shall be deemed to refer to the Department of Transportation, which is part of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency as provided by Section 13975 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

295.

The “director” is the Director of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

295.5.

A “disabled person” is any of the following:

(a) Any person who has lost, or has lost the use of, one or more lower extremities or both hands, or who has significant limitation in the use of lower extremities, or who has a diagnosed disease or disorder which substantially impairs or interferes with mobility, or who is so severely disabled as to be unable to move without the aid of an assistant device.

(b) Any person who is blind to the extent that the person’s central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye, with corrective lenses, as measured by the Snellen test, or visual acuity that is greater than 20/200, but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle not greater than 20 degrees.

(c) Any person who suffers from lung disease to the extent of any of the following:

(1) The person’s forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one second when measured by spirometry is less than one liter.

(2) The person’s arterial oxygen tension (pO2) is less than 60 mm/Hg on room air while the person is at rest.

(d) Any person who is impaired by cardiovascular disease to the extent that the person’s functional limitations are classified in severity as class III or class IV based upon standards accepted by the American Heart Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

295.7.

A “disabled veteran” is any person who, as a result of injury or disease suffered while on active service with the armed forces of the United States, suffers any of the following:

(a) Has a disability which has been rated at 100 percent by the Department of Veterans Affairs or the military service from which the veteran was discharged, due to a diagnosed disease or disorder which substantially impairs or interferes with mobility.

(b) Is so severely disabled as to be unable to move without the aid of an assistant device.

(c) Has lost, or has lost use of, one or more limbs.

(d) Has suffered permanent blindness, as defined in Section 19153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 554, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

296.

A “distributor” is any person other than a manufacturer who sells or distributes new vehicles subject to registration under this code, new trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1, or new off-highway motorcycles or all-terrain vehicles subject to identification under this code, to dealers in this state and maintains representatives for the purpose of contacting dealers or prospective dealers in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 836, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

297.

A “distributor branch” is an office maintained by a distributor for the sale of new vehicles or new trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1 to dealers or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, the distributor’s representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 539, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

300.

A “drawbar” is a rigid structure forming a connection between a trailer and a towing vehicle, securely attached to both vehicles by nonrigid means and carrying no part of the load of either vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

A “driveaway-towaway operation” is any operation in which any motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles coupled together constitutes the commodity being transported, when one or more sets of wheels of any such motor vehicle or motor vehicles are on the roadway, and when one or more of such vehicles are being operated under a manufacturer's, dealer's, or transporter’s special plates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

305.

A “driver” is a person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle. The term “driver” does not include the tillerman or other person who, in an auxiliary capacity, assists the driver in the steering or operation of any articulated firefighting apparatus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 213.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

A “driver’s license” is a valid license to drive the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles for which a person is licensed under this code or by a foreign jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 213.)
-------------------------------------------

310.4.

A “driving instructor” is, except as provided in Section 11105.5, an employee of a driving school licensed by the department to instruct others in the operation of motor vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 703.)
-------------------------------------------

310.6.

A “driving school” is a business which, for compensation, conducts or offers to conduct instruction in the operation of motor vehicles. As used in this section, “instruction” includes classroom driver education, in-vehicle driver training, and correspondence study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 703.)
-------------------------------------------

310.8.

A “driving school operator” is either a driving school owner who operates his own driving school or an employee of a driving school who is designated by the driving school owner of such school to personally direct and manage the school for the owner.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 311.5 by Stats. 1975, Ch. 703.)
-------------------------------------------

311.

A “driving school owner” is any person licensed by the department to engage in the business of giving instruction for compensation in the driving of motor vehicles or in the preparation of an applicant for examination for a driver’s license issued by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 703.)
-------------------------------------------

312.

The term “drug” means any substance or combination of substances, other than alcohol, which could so affect the nervous system, brain, or muscles of a person as to impair, to an appreciable degree, his ability to drive a vehicle in the manner that an ordinarily prudent and cautious man, in full possession of his faculties, using reasonable care, would drive a similar vehicle under like conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------

312.5.

(a) An “electric bicycle” is a bicycle equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor that does not exceed 750 watts of power.

(1) A “class 1 electric bicycle,” or “low-speed pedal-assisted electric bicycle,” is a bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, that is not capable of exclusively propelling the bicycle, except as
 provided in paragraph (4), that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour, and that is not capable of providing assistance to reach speeds greater than 20 miles per hour.

(2) A “class 2 electric bicycle,” or “low-speed throttle-assisted electric bicycle,” is a bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle, and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour.

(3) A “class 3 electric bicycle,” or “speed pedal-assisted electric bicycle,” is a bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, that is not capable of exclusively propelling the bicycle,
 except as provided in paragraph (4), and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 28 miles per hour, and equipped with a speedometer.

(4) A class 1 or class 3 electric bicycle may have start assistance or a walk mode that propels the electric bicycle on motor power alone, up to a maximum speed of 3.7 miles per hour.

(b) A person riding an electric bicycle, as defined in this section, is subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21200) of Chapter 1 of Division 11.

(c) On and after January 1, 2017, manufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently affixed, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle. The label shall contain the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric bicycle, and shall be printed in Arial font in at least 9-point type.

(d) The following vehicles are not electric bicycles under this code and shall not be advertised, sold, offered for sale, or labeled as electric bicycles:

(1) A vehicle with two or three wheels powered by an electric motor that is intended by the manufacturer to be modifiable to attain a speed greater than
 20 miles per hour on motor power alone or to attain more than 750 watts of power.

(2) A vehicle that is modified to attain a speed greater than 20 miles per hour
 on motor power alone or to have motor power of more than 750 watts.

(3) A vehicle that is modified to have its operable pedals removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 791, Sec. 2.   (SB 1271)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

313.

The term “electric personal assistive mobility device” or “EPAMD” means a self-balancing, nontandem two-wheeled device, that is not greater than 20 inches deep and 25 inches wide and can turn in place, designed to transport only one person, with an electric propulsion system averaging less than 750 watts (1 horsepower), the maximum speed of which, when powered solely by a propulsion system on a paved level surface, is no more than 12.5 miles per hour.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

313.5.

An “electrically motorized board” is any wheeled device that has a floorboard designed to be stood upon when riding that is not greater than 60 inches deep and 18 inches wide, is designed to transport only one person,
 and has an electric propulsion system averaging less than 1,000 watts, the maximum speed of which, when powered solely by a propulsion system on a paved level surface, is no more than 20 miles per hour. The device may be designed to also be powered by human propulsion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 777, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

314.

An “expressway” is a portion of highway that is part of either of the following:

(a) An expressway system established by a county under Section 941.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) An expressway system established by a county before January 1, 1989, as described in subdivision (g) of Section 941.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

315.

“Essential parts” are all integral and body parts of a vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code, the removal, alteration, or substitution of which would tend to conceal the identity of the vehicle or substantially alter its appearance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

320.

“Established place of business” is a place actually occupied either continuously or at regular periods by any of the following:

(a) A dealer, remanufacturer, remanufacturer branch, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, automobile driving school, or traffic violator school where the books and records pertinent to the type of business being conducted are kept.

(b) An automobile dismantler where the books and records pertinent to the type of business being conducted are kept. A place of business of an automobile dismantler which qualified as an “established place of business” before September 17, 1970, is an “established place of business” as defined in this section.

(c) A registration service where the books and records pertinent to the type of business being conducted are kept.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 54.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

320.5.

An “extralegal load” is a single unit or an assembled item which, due to its design, cannot be reasonably reduced or dismantled in size or weight so that it can be legally transported as a load without a permit as required by Section 35780. This section does not apply to loads on passenger cars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   Effective June 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

“Factory-built housing” is a structure as defined in Section 19971 of the Health and Safety Code. As used in this code, factory-built housing is a trailer coach which is in excess of eight feet in width or in excess of 40 feet in length.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1150, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

(a) A “farm labor vehicle” is any motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of nine or more farmworkers, in addition to the driver, to or from a place of employment or employment-related activities.

(b) For the purpose of this section, a farmworker is any person engaged in rendering personal services for hire and compensation in connection with the production or harvesting of any farm products.

(c) “Farm labor vehicle” does not include:

(1) Any vehicle carrying only members of the immediate family of the owner or driver thereof.

(2) Any vehicle while being operated under specific authority granted by the Public Utilities Commission or under specific authority granted to a transit system by an authorized city or county agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

A “fifth-wheel travel trailer” is a vehicle designed for recreational purposes to carry persons or property on its own structure and so constructed as to be drawn by a motor vehicle by means of a kingpin connecting device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

324.5.

A “former prisoner of war” is any person who, while serving as a member of the United States Armed Forces, as a member of the Philippine Commonwealth Armed Forces, as a part of a United States Expeditionary Force, or as a United States civilian, was held as a prisoner of war by forces hostile to the United States during any armed conflict and is currently a resident of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 893, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

A “foreign jurisdiction” is any other state, the District of Columbia, territories or possessions of the United States, and foreign states, provinces, or countries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

330.

A “foreign vehicle” is a vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code brought into this State from a foreign jurisdiction other than in the ordinary course of business, by or through a manufacturer or dealer and not registered in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

331.

(a) A “franchise” is a written agreement between two or more persons having all of the following conditions:

(1) A commercial relationship of definite duration or continuing indefinite duration.

(2) The franchisee is granted the right to offer for sale or lease, or to sell or lease at retail new motor vehicles or new trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1 manufactured or distributed by the franchisor or the right to perform authorized warranty repairs and service, or the right to perform any combination of these activities.

(3) The franchisee constitutes a component of the franchisor’s distribution system.

(4) The operation of the franchisee’s business is substantially associated with the franchisor’s trademark, trade name, advertising, or other commercial symbol designating the franchisor.

(5) The operation of a portion of the franchisee’s business is substantially reliant on the franchisor for a continued supply of new vehicles, parts, or accessories.

(b) The term “franchise” does not include an agreement entered into by a manufacturer or distributor and a person where all the following apply:

(1) The person is authorized to perform warranty repairs and service on vehicles manufactured or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor.

(2) The person is not a new motor vehicle dealer franchisee of the manufacturer or distributor.

(3) The person’s repair and service facility is not located within the relevant market area of a new motor vehicle dealer franchisee of the manufacturer or distributor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 539, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

331.1.

A “franchisee” is any person who, pursuant to a franchise, receives new motor vehicles subject to registration under this code, new off-highway motorcycles, as defined in Section 436, new all-terrain vehicles, as defined in Section 111, or new trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1 from the franchisor and who offers for sale or lease, or sells or leases the vehicles at retail or is granted the right to perform authorized warranty repairs and service, or the right to perform any combination of these activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 836, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

331.2.

A “franchisor” is any person who manufactures, assembles, or distributes new motor vehicles subject to registration under this code, new off-highway motorcycles, as defined in Section 436, new all-terrain vehicles, as defined in Section 111, or new trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1 and who grants a franchise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 836, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

331.3.

A “recreational vehicle franchise” is a written agreement between two or more persons having both of the following conditions:

(a) A commercial relationship of definite duration or continuing indefinite duration.

(b) The franchisee is granted the right to offer for sale or lease, or to sell or lease at retail, new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, that are manufactured or distributed by the franchisor, or the right to perform authorized warranty repairs and service, or the right to perform any combination of these activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 743, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

332.

“Freeway” is a highway in respect to which the owners of abutting lands have no right or easement of access to or from their abutting lands or in respect to which such owners have only limited or restricted right or easement of access.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

335.

A “gantry truck” is a motor vehicle so designed and constructed that it straddles the load to be transported and by means of appropriate mechanism picks up the load and supports it during transportation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

336.

“General public paratransit vehicle” means any motor vehicle designed for carrying no more than 24 persons and the driver, that provides local transportation to the general public, including transportation of pupils at or below the 12th-grade level to or from a public or private school or school activity, under the exclusive jurisdiction of a publicly owned and operated transit system through one of the following modes: dial-a-ride, subscription service, or route-deviated bus service. Vehicles used in the exclusive transportation of disabled persons as defined in Section 99206.5 of the Public Utilities Code, or of persons 55 years of age or older, including any persons necessary to provide assistance to these passengers, are not general public paratransit vehicles.

However, transportation of attendants, companions, or both traveling together with those individuals with disabilities who are determined to be eligible for complementary paratransit services in accordance with Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) and federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto, shall not be sufficient to qualify a vehicle as a general public paratransit vehicle.

A vehicle that provides local transportation for the general public through one of the following modes: dial-a-ride, subscription service, or route-deviated bus service, but does not provide transportation of pupils at or below the 12th-grade level to or from a public or private school or school activity, is a transit bus, as defined by Section 642, and is not a general public paratransit vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

340.

A “garage” is a building or other place wherein the business of storing or safekeeping vehicles of a type required to be registered under this code and which belong to members of the general public is conducted for compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

345.

A “golf cart” is a motor vehicle having not less than three wheels in contact with the ground, having an unladen weight less than 1,300 pounds, which is designed to be and is operated at not more than 15 miles per hour and designed to carry golf equipment and not more than two persons, including the driver.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1303.)
-------------------------------------------

350.

(a) “Gross vehicle weight rating” (GVWR) means the weight specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single vehicle.

(b) Gross combination weight rating (GCWR) means the weight specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a combination or articulated vehicle. In the absence of a weight specified by the manufacturer, GCWR shall be determined by adding the GVWR of the power unit and the total unladen weight of the towed units and any load thereon.
